District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2602.28

Violations of provisions.

Repealed.

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 414, ch. 93, title 11, § 28
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 2(u), 38 DCR 314
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330
1981 Ed., § 35-1428.
1973 Ed., § 35-1128.